Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.88.010

Discharge of ballast.

A code city may exercise the powers relating to regulation of discharge of ballast in harbors within or in front of such city as authorized by RCW 88.28.060.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.88.010.]